Utah statutes.
53-6-104.   Appointment of director of division -- Qualifications --
Appointment of employees -- Term of office -- Compensation.
(1)  The commissioner, upon recommendation of the council and with the
approval of the governor, shall appoint a director of the  division.
(2)  The director is the executive and administrative head of the division and
shall be experienced in administration and possess additional qualifications
as determined by the commissioner and as provided by law.
(3)  The director shall be a full-time officer of the state.
(4)  The director may appoint deputies, consultants, clerks, and other
employees from eligibility lists authorized by the Department of Human
Resource Management.
(5)  The director may be removed from his position at the will of the
commissioner.
(6)  The director shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter
19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.
